Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. The Alaska Bar Association.

Sec. 08.08.010.
Creation of Alaska Bar Association.

There is created an instrumentality of the state known as the Alaska Bar Association, referred to in this chapter as the Alaska Bar.
The Alaska Bar shall have a common seal, may sue and be sued, and may, for the purpose of carrying into effect and promoting the objects of the Alaska Bar, enter into contracts and acquire, hold, encumber, and dispose of real and personal property.

History.

(§ 2 ch 196 SLA 1955)

Sec. 08.08.020.
Members.

Every person licensed to practice law in the state shall become a member in the Alaska Bar. All active and inactive members in good standing as of September 14, 1976, shall be considered to be members.

A person licensed to practice law in the state who, on September 14, 1976, is not enrolled on the membership rolls, shall be reinstated as a member only in accordance with the Alaska Bar Rules.

History.

(§ 4 ch 196 SLA 1955; am § 2 ch 181 SLA 1976)